Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Offenses Against the Family.

Sec. 11.51.100.
Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree if, being a parent, guardian, or other person legally charged with the care of a child under 16 years of age, the person

intentionally deserts the child in a place under circumstances creating a substantial risk of physical injury to the child;

leaves the child with another person who is not a parent, guardian, or lawful custodian of the child knowing that the person is

registered or required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63 or a law or ordinance in another jurisdiction with similar requirements;

charged by complaint, information, or indictment with a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.455

or a law or ordinance in another jurisdiction with similar elements; or

charged by complaint, information, or indictment with an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a crime described in (B) of this paragraph;

leaves the child with another person knowing that the person has previously physically mistreated or had sexual contact with any child, and the other person causes physical injury to or engages in sexual contact with the child; or

recklessly fails to provide an adequate quantity of food or liquids to a child, causing protracted impairment of the child’s health.

A person commits the crime of endangering the welfare of a minor in the first degree if the person transports a child in a motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft while in violation of AS

28.35.030

.

In this section, “physically mistreated” means

having committed an act punishable under AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.250

; or

having applied force to a child that, under the circumstances in which it was applied, or considering the age or physical condition of the child, constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation because of the substantial and unjustifiable risk of

death;

serious or protracted disfigurement;

protracted impairment of health;

loss or impairment of the function of a body member or organ;

substantial skin bruising, burning, or other skin injury;

internal bleeding or subdural hematoma;

bone fracture; or

prolonged or extreme pain, swelling, or injury to soft tissue.

Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under (a)(3) of this section is a

class B felony if the child dies;

class C felony if the child suffers sexual contact, sexual penetration, or serious physical injury; or

class A misdemeanor if the child suffers physical injury.

Endangering the welfare of a child under (b) of this subsection is a class A misdemeanor.

Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under (a)(1), (2), or (4) of this section is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 5 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 127 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 20 SLA 2011; am §§ 3, 4 ch 70 SLA 2012; am § 5 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (e) were enacted in 2004 as a series of amendments to subsections (a) and (d) and to what was subsection (c) but is now subsection (f). The specific changes have been revised and consolidated into subsections (b) and (e) in order to maintain consistency of existing references within charging documents, court judgments, the state criminal history computer system, and the form of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment for class B felonies, AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the amendment of this section by § 5,
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375 (JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.

Sec. 11.51.110.
Endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree.

A person commits the offense of endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree if the person, while caring for a child under 10 years of age,

causes or allows the child to enter or remain in a dwelling or vehicle in which a controlled substance is stored in violation of AS 11.71; or

is impaired by an intoxicant, whether or not prescribed for the person under AS 17.30, and there is no third person who is at least 12 years of age and not impaired by an intoxicant present to care for the child.

In this section,

“impaired” means that a person is unconscious or a person is physically or mentally affected so that the person does not have the ability to care for the basic safety or personal needs of a child with the caution characteristic of a sober person of ordinary prudence;

“intoxicant” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.990

.

Endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree is a violation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 14 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For punishment of violations, see AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.

Sec. 11.51.120.
Criminal nonsupport.

A person commits the crime of criminal nonsupport if, being a person legally charged with the support of a child the person knowingly fails, without lawful excuse, to provide support for the child.

As used in this section “support” includes necessary food, care, clothing, shelter, medical attention, and education. There is no failure to provide medical attention to a child if the child is provided treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by an accredited practitioner of the church or denomination.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, criminal nonsupport is a class A misdemeanor.

Criminal nonsupport is a class C felony if the support the person failed to provide is monetary support required by a court or administrative order from this or another jurisdiction and, at the time the person knowingly failed, without lawful excuse, to provide the support,

the aggregate amount of accrued monetary child support arrearage is $20,000 or more;

no child support payment has been made for a period of 24 consecutive months or more; or

the person had been previously convicted under this section or a similar provision in another jurisdiction and

the aggregate amount of accrued monetary child support arrearage is $5,000 or more; or

no child support payment has been made for a period of six months or more.

In addition to the provisions of (c) and (d) of this section, criminal nonsupport is punishable by loss or restriction of a recreational license as provided in AS

12.55.139

.

In this section,

“child” means a person

under 18 years of age; or

18 years of age or older for whom a person is ordered to pay support under a valid court or administrative order;

“child support” means support for a child;

“without lawful excuse” means having the financial ability to provide support or having the capacity to acquire that ability through the exercise of reasonable efforts.

History.

(§ 5 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Reckless endangerment — AS

11.41.250

Murder in the second degree — AS

11.41.110(a)(1)

, (2)

Manslaughter — AS

11.41.120

Criminally negligent homicide — AS

11.41.130

Original Code Provision — AS 11.35.010.

TD: V, 62-65

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For additional penalties for criminal nonsupport and aiding nonpayment of child support, see AS

12.55.139

.

For purpose, findings, and nonseverability provisions related to the 1998 amendments to this section, see §§ 1 and 56, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For applicability provisions relating to the 2004 enactment of subsection (d) of this section, see § 19, ch. 108, SLA 2004 in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendment to (c) of this section by § 54(b), ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sec. 11.51.121.
Aiding the nonpayment of child support in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of aiding the nonpayment of child support in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.51.122

and the person knows the obligor

has an aggregate amount of accrued monetary child support arrearage of $20,000 or more;

has not made a child support payment for a period of 24 consecutive months or more; or

had been previously convicted under AS

11.51.120

or a similar provision in another jurisdiction and

has an aggregate amount of accrued monetary child support arrearage of $5,000 or more; or

has not made a child support payment for a period of 24 consecutive months or more.

Aiding the nonpayment of child support in the first degree is a class C felony.

In addition to the penalties under (b) of this section, aiding the nonpayment of child support in the first degree is punishable by loss or restriction of a recreational license as provided in AS

12.55.139

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For applicability provisions relating to the 2004 enactment of this section, see § 19,
ch. 108, SLA 2004 in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For additional penalties for criminal nonsupport and aiding nonpayment of child support, see AS

12.55.139

.

Sec. 11.51.122.
Aiding the nonpayment of child support in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of aiding the nonpayment of child support in the second degree if the person knows that an obligor has a duty under an administrative or judicial order for periodic payment of child support, for cash medical support, or for the provision of health care coverage for a child under a medical support order or a cash medical support order, or both, and

being a person with a statutory duty to disclose information to a child support enforcement agency, intentionally withholds the information when it is requested by a child support enforcement agency;

being an employer of the obligor, intentionally withholds information about the residence or employment of the obligor, the eligibility of the obligor’s children for coverage under the employer’s health insurance plan, or the cost of the coverage of the children under the plan, when that information is requested by a child support enforcement agency or when the employer is required by state or federal law to report the information without a request by a child support enforcement agency; or

intentionally participates in a commercial, business, employment, or other arrangement with the obligor, knowing at the time that the arrangement is made that it will allow the obligor to avoid paying all or some of the support when it is due or to avoid having a lien placed on assets for the payment of delinquent support; receipt of a substantial asset for less than fair market value from an obligor after the obligor’s support order has been established constitutes a rebuttable presumption that the person receiving the asset knew that the transfer would allow the obligor to avoid paying all or some of the support or to avoid having a lien placed on the asset.

In a prosecution under (a)(2) and (3) of this section, it is a defense that the

defendant did not intend to assist the obligor in the nonpayment of child support or in the avoidance of a duty to provide health care coverage of a child; or

obligor did not intend to avoid paying child support or to avoid providing health care coverage of a child.

This section does not prohibit an arrangement entered into with an attorney for the purpose of paying the attorney who represents the child support obligor in proceedings to contest or modify a child support order.

In this section, “child” and “child support” have the meanings given in AS

11.51.120

.

Aiding the nonpayment of child support in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalties under (e) of this section, aiding the nonpayment of child support in the second degree is punishable by loss or restriction of a recreational license as provided in AS

12.55.139

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 86 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2 ch 106 SLA 2000; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 108 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (f), and subsection (f) was enacted as (e). These were relettered in 2004, at which time what was formerly (d) was relettered as (e) and an internal reference in subsection (f) was conformed.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For additional penalties for criminal nonsupport and aiding nonpayment of child support, see
AS

12.55.139

.

Sec. 11.51.125.
Failure to permit visitation with a minor.

A custodian commits the offense of failure to permit visitation with a minor if the custodian intentionally, and without just excuse, fails to permit visitation with a child under 18 years of age in the custodian’s custody in substantial conformance with a court order that is specific as to when the custodian must permit another to have visitation with that child.

The custodian may not be charged under this section with more than one offense in respect to what is, under the court order, a single continuous period of visitation.

In a prosecution under this section, existing provisions of law prohibiting the disclosure of confidential communications between husband and wife do not apply, and both husband and wife are competent to testify for or against each other as to all relevant matters, if a court order has awarded custody to one spouse and visitation to the other.

As used in this section,

“court order” means a decree, judgment, or order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;

“custodian” means a natural person who has been awarded custody, either temporary or permanent, of a child under 18 years of age;

“just excuse” includes illness of the child which makes it dangerous to the health of the child for visitation to take place in conformance with the court order; “just excuse” does not include the wish of the child not to have visitation with the person entitled to it.

Failure to permit visitation with a minor is a violation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “violation” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Violation procedures — AS

12.25.150

Fine authorized for violation — AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

Sentences for violations — AS

12.55.140

Custodial interference in the first and second degree — AS

11.41.320

,

11.41.330

Original Code Provision — AS 11.36.010.

TD: V, 66.

For action for failure to permit visitation with minor child, see AS

25.20.140

.

For punishment of violations, see AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provisions relating to disclosure of confidential communications between married persons, see Alaska Rule of Evidence 505.

Sec. 11.51.130.
Contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

A person commits the crime of contributing to the delinquency of a minor if, being 19 years of age or older or being under 19 years of age and having the disabilities of minority removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

, the person aids, induces, causes, or encourages a child

under 18 years of age to do any act prohibited by state law unless the child’s disabilities of minority have been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

;

under 18 years of age or allows a child under 18 years of age to enter or remain in the immediate physical presence of the unlawful manufacture, use, display, or delivery of a controlled substance knowing that the manufacture, use, display, or delivery is occurring, unless the child’s disabilities of minority have been removed for general purposes under AS 09.55.590;

under 16 years of age to be repeatedly absent from school, without just cause; or

under 18 years of age to be absent from the custody of a parent, guardian, or custodian without the permission of the parent, guardian, or custodian or without the knowledge of the parent, guardian, or custodian, unless the child’s disabilities of minority have been removed for general purposes under AS 09.55.590 or the person has immunity under AS

47.10.350

or

47.10.398(a)

; it is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this paragraph that, at the time of the alleged offense, the defendant

reasonably believed that the child was in danger of physical injury or in need of temporary shelter; and

within 12 hours after taking the actions comprising the alleged offense, notified a peace officer, a law enforcement agency, or the Department of Health and Social Services of the name of the child and the child’s location.

Contributing to the delinquency of a minor is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 5 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 8 ch 33 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Definition of “law,” “drug,” “building,” “sexual contact” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Sexual assault in the first and second degree — AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.420

Sexual abuse of a minor in the first, second, third and fourth degree — AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.130; AS 11.40.150.

TD: V, 66-68.

For offenses involving sexual contact with a minor, see AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For legislative purpose related to the 1996 amendment to (a)(4) of this section, see § 1, ch. 120 SLA 1996 in Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A public shelter which houses runaway minors under 16 years of age without parental knowledge and consent may subject itself to prosecution for contributing to the delinquency of a minor.
If the runaway minor requests secrecy because he or she has been physically or sexually abused and fears retribution if returned to a parent, the minor should be accorded the full protection and services of the state rather than being harbored by a runaway shelter.
May 8, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.51.140.
Unlawful marrying.

A person commits the crime of unlawful marrying if the person knowingly marries or purports to marry

another when that person or the other is lawfully married to a third person;

more than one person simultaneously; or

a person who simultaneously is marrying another person.

Unlawful marrying is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 5 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.050; AS 11.40.060.

TD: V, 70.

For provisions specifying prohibited marriages, see AS

25.05.021

.

For provisions declaring incestuous or bigamous marriages void, see AS

25.24.020

.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.